Hawaii statutes.
[§104-2.7] Provisions of law;
waiver. No provision of this chapter may in any way be contravened or set
aside by private contract. [L 2014, c 130, §1]

Note

Section applies to all contracts entered into on or after
July 1, 2014. L 2014, c 130, §9.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next